nl: Rolschaats rem vorm: Platte kop; Bloem; Hart; Rond; Ster; Stopbord/achthoekig; Overige
sl-SI: Oblika zavore kotalk: Ploska glava; Roža; Srce; Okrogla; Zvezda; Znak stop/osemkotnik; Drugo
zh-CN: 旱冰鞋刹车头形状: 平头; 花形; 心形; 圆形; 星形; 八角形/停止标志; 其他
fr: Forme du frein de patin à roulettes: Tête plate; Fleur; Cœur; Ronde; Étoile; Panneau d’arrêt/octogone; Autre
vi: Hình dạng phanh giày trượt patin: Đầu phẳng; Bông hoa; Trái tim; Tròn; Ngôi sao; Biển báo dừng/Hình bát giác; Khác
cs: Tvar brzdy kolečkových bruslí: Plochá hlava; Květina; Srdce; Kulatý; Hvězda; Stopka/osmiúhelník; Jiné
de: Form der Rollschuhbremse: Flacher Kopf; Blume; Herz; Rund; Stern; Stoppschild/Achteckig; Sonstige
th: รูปทรงเบรกของรองเท้าสเก็ต: หัวแบน; รูปดอกไม้; รูปหัวใจ; ทรงกลม; รูปดาว; ป้ายหยุด/แปดเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
nb: Bremseform for rulleskøyte: Flatt hode; Blomst; Hjerte; Rund; Stjerne; Stoppskilt/åttekant; Annet
pt-BR: Patins formato do freio: Cabeça chata; Flor; Coração; Redondo; Estrela; Placa de pare/octógono; Outro
pl: Kształt hamulca wrotki: Płaski; Kwiatek; Serce; Okrągły; Gwiazda; Znak stopu / ośmiokąt; Inny
sv: Rullskridskobromsens form: Platt huvud; Blomma; Hjärta; Rund; Stjärna; Stoppskylt/oktagon; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма на спирачката за ролкови кънки: Плоска глава; Цвете; Сърце; Кръгла; Звезда; Знак „Стоп“/осмоъгълник; Друго
ko: 롤러스케이트 브레이크 모양: 플랫 헤드; 꽃; 하트; 원형; 별; 정지 표지판/팔각형; 기타
sk-SK: Tvar brzdy na kolieskových korčuliach: Plochá hlava; Kvet; Srdce; Okrúhly; Hviezda; Stopka/oktagon; Iné
ro-RO: Formă a frânei pentru patine cu rotile: Cap plat; Floare; Inimă; Rotund; Stea; Semn stop/octogon; Altele
lt-LT: Riedučių stabdžio forma: Plokščia galvutė; Gėlė; Širdelė; Apvali; Žvaigždė; „Stop“ ženklas / aštuonkampis; Kita
zh-TW: 溜冰鞋煞車形狀: 平頭; 花朵; 心形; 圓形; 星形; 停止標誌/八邊形; 其他
el: Σχήμα φρένου πατινιών με ρόδες: Επίπεδη κεφαλή; Λουλούδι; Καρδιά; Στρογγυλό; Αστέρι; Σήμα stop/οκτάγωνο; Άλλο
en: Roller skate brake shape: Flat head; Flower; Heart; Round; Star; Stop sign/octagon; Other
fi: Rullaluistinjarrun muoto: Tasapää; Kukka; Sydän; Pyöreä; Tähti; Stop-merkki / kahdeksankulmio; Muu
it: Shape dei freni dei pattini a rotelle: Testa piatta; Fiore; Cuore; Rotondo; Stella; Segnale di stop/ottagono; Altro
hu: Görkorcsolya fékjének alakja: Lapos fejű; Virág; Szív; Kerek; Csillag; Stoptábla / nyolcszög; Egyéb
da: Rulleskøjtebremse Shapes: Fladt hoved; Blomst; Hjerte; Rund; Stjerne; Stopsignal/ottekantet; Andet
ru: Форма тормоза роликовых коньков: Плоская; Цветок; Сердце; Круглая; Звезда; Знак «Стоп»/восьмиугольник; Другое
es: Forma del freno del patín de ruedas: Cabeza plana; Flor; Corazón; Redonda; Estrella; Señal de alto/octágono; Otro
ja: ローラースケートのブレーキ形状: フラットヘッド; 花型; ハート型; 丸型; 星型; 一時停止標識 / 八角形; その他
hr-HR: Oblik kočnice za role: Ravna; Cvijet; Srce; Okrugla; Zvijezda; Znak stop / osmerokut; Ostalo
tr: Paten freni şekli: Düz başlık; Çiçek; Kalp; Yuvarlak; Yıldız; Dur işareti/sekizgen; Diğer
pt-PT: Forma do travão dos patins: Cabeça chata; Flor; Coração; Redonda; Estrela; Sinal de stop/octógono; Outro